Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-801
Purposes of sections.

The purposes of sections 42-801 to 42-823 are to protect the rights of children and to promote the public welfare by preserving, promoting, and protecting family life and the institution of matrimony, and to provide means for the reconciliation of spouses and the amicable settlement of domestic and family controversies.

Laws 1965, c. 228, § 1, p. 654.